test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaebraaz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - käbrāz: # Noun 168 'eng /est käbe/fin' - full paradigm
     käbrāz+N+Sg+Nom: käbrāz
     käbrāz+N+Sg+Gen: käbrā
     käbrāz+N+Sg+Par: käbrāzt
     käbrāz+N+Sg+Dat: käbrān
     käbrāz+N+Sg+Ins: käbrāks
     käbrāz+N+Sg+Ill: [käʼbrõz, käʼbrõ, käbrõz, käbrõ]
     käbrāz+N+Sg+Ela: käbrāst
     käbrāz+N+Pl+Nom: käbrād
     käbrāz+N+Pl+Gen: käbrād
     käbrāz+N+Pl+Par: käbrīdi
     käbrāz+N+Pl+Dat: käbrādõn
     käbrāz+N+Pl+Ins: käbrādõks
     käbrāz+N+Pl+Ill: käbrīž
     käbrāz+N+Pl+Ela: käbrīst
